Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6040.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 43523a. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this part, an individual shall not hunt small game, unless the individual possesses a current base license. A base license authorizes the individual named in the license to hunt for small game, except for animals or birds that require a special license. (2) If authorized in an order issued under part 401, an individual who possesses a current base license may take specified fur-bearing animals by means other than trapping during the open season for hunting these fur-bearing animals. However, an individual who goes on a bobcat hunt with a licensed hunter is not required to possess a base license if the individual does not carry a firearm, bow, or crossbow and does not own dogs used to chase or locate a bobcat during the hunt. (3) The fee for a base license is as follows: (a) Subject to subdivision (b), for a resident, $10.00. (b) For a person with disabilities, a resident minor child, or a nonresident minor child, $5.00. (c) Subject to subdivision (b), for a nonresident, $150.00. (4) A base license is void between the hours of 1/2 hour after sunset and 1/2 hour before sunrise with the exception of coyote hunting. (5) A nonresident may purchase a limited nonresident small game license entitling that individual to hunt for a 7-day period all species of small game that are available to hunt under a nonresident base license. The fee for a 7-day limited nonresident small game license is $80.00. Except for the purchase of a waterfowl hunting license under section 43525b, the purchase of a 7-day limited nonresident small game license does not entitle the holder to purchase any additional licenses. (6) Beginning March 1, 2018, a A nonresident may purchase a 3-day limited nonresident small game license entitling that individual to hunt for a 3-day period all species of small game that are available to hunt under a nonresident base license. The fee for a 3-day limited nonresident small game license is $50.00. Except for the purchase of a waterfowl hunting license issued under section 43525b, the purchase of a 3-day limited nonresident small game license does not entitle the holder to purchase any additional licenses. (7) Not later than March 1, 2018, the The department shall develop an electronic license that allows an individual to display an electronic copy of his or her base license using an electronic device. Sec. 43540f. (1) The department shall do all of the following: (a) Establish designated hunting zones on state-managed lands with paved or mowed paths, accessible blinds, and vehicle access tailored to a person with disabilities. (b) Adopt programs that pair a person with disabilities with trained guides in adaptive hunts for different game species. (c) Publish an official interactive map showing accessibility features to help a person with disabilities plan outings. (d) Develop specialized hunter safety training tailored for a person with disabilities, including online and in-person adaptive instruction focusing on safe participation with accommodation tools. (e) Partner with nonprofit organizations that support outdoor access to host adaptive hunts or provide resources for a person with disabilities. (f) Create a state-supported mentor recruitment and training program to pair licensed hunters with a person with disabilities, potentially offering incentives or recognition for mentors. (g) Ensure that a dedicated hunting zone established in this state does not impose restrictions on a person with disabilities that is more limiting than those applied statewide unless those restrictions are necessary for public safety or wildlife conservation. If those restrictions are necessary, the department shall provide comparable opportunities for participation through alternative locations, seasons, or methods reasonably accessible to a person with disabilities. (2) As used in this section, "person with disabilities" means that term as defined in section 19a of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.19a.